Maryland, session 2025, HB1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force on the Establishment of a State Park Dedicated to
Veterans’ Care.
(b) (1) The Task Force shall include the following members:
(i) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
(ii) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker
of the House;
(iii) the Secretary of Natural Resources, or the Secretary’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1181*

HOUSE BILL 1181
(iv) the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(v) the Director of the Maryland Park Service, or the Director’s
designee;
(vi) one county commissioner of Washington County, appointed by
the President of the Washington County Board of Commissioners;
(vii) the County Administrator of Washington County, or the County
Administrator’s designee;
(viii) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Natural
Resources:
1. one representative of the Hagerstown–Washington
County Convention and Visitors Bureau;
2. one representative of an organization that provides
therapeutic services to veterans; and
3. the owner of land located in the Southern portion of
Washington County that has been proposed for transfer to the State for the purpose of
establishing a State park dedicated to veterans’ care; and
(ix) one resident from legislative district 2 in Washington County,
designated by a majority of the members of the Washington County Delegation to the
General Assembly.
(2) In addition to the members specified under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Secretary of Natural Resources may invite a representative of the National
Park Service and any other relevant stakeholders to serve as members of the Task Force.
(c) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall designate the chair of the Task
Force.
(d) The Department of Natural Resources shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:

HOUSE BILL 1181 3
(1) study issues and estimate costs related to the establishment of a State
park dedicated to providing recreational opportunities and therapeutic services to veterans;
(2) make recommendations regarding:
(i) services and amenities to be provided by the park;
(ii) operational models for the park, including how operational and
maintenance responsibilities could be shared between the Maryland Park Service and
partner organizations;
(iii) options for funding the initial start–up costs of the park,
including infrastructure and capital costs; and
(iv) self–sustaining funding models for the ongoing operational costs
of the park; and
(3) develop an action plan identifying next steps for the establishment of
the park.
(g) On or before December 1, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee and
the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.